Maryland, session 2026, HB0609.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
13–209.
(a) (1) Before any other distribution under this section, in any fiscal year that
bonds secured by a pledge of the State transfer tax are outstanding, the revenue from the
transfer tax shall be used to pay, as and when due, the principal of and interest on the
bonds.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0609*

HOUSE BILL 609
(2) The Department shall deduct the cost of administering the transfer tax
from the taxes collected under this title and credit those revenues to the fund established
under § 1–203.3 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(3) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, after deducting
the revenues required under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the revenue from
transfer tax is payable to the Comptroller for deposit in a special fund.
(4) In any fiscal year in which transfer tax revenue is used to pay debt
service on outstanding bonds under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the distribution of
revenues in the special fund under this section and as specified in § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the
Natural Resources Article, for State land acquisition, or to the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund to the extent any debt service is attributable to that Fund, shall be
reduced by an amount equal to the debt service for the fiscal year.
(c) (1) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, of the balance of the revenue in
the special fund, not required under subsection (b) of this section:
(i) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2002, $47,268,585 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in subsection (d) of this section;
(ii) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2003, $102,833,869 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in the State budget;
(iii) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2004, $147,374,444 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State, and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in the State budget; and
(iv) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2005, $68,223,132 shall be
allocated to the General Fund of the State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided
in subsection (d) of this section.
(2) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for the fiscal years beginning
July 1, 2006 and each subsequent fiscal year, the balance of the revenue in the special fund,
not required under subsection (b) of this section shall be allocated as provided in subsection
(d) of this section.
[(3) (i) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, for fiscal years 2026
through 2029, of the balance of the revenue in the special fund not required under
subsection (b) of this section, $25,000,000 shall be allocated to the General Fund of the
State and the remainder shall be allocated as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(ii) For each of fiscal years 2026 through 2029, the allocation
required under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall reduce the amount allocated for

HOUSE BILL 609 3
Program Open Space land acquisition purposes identified in subsection (d)(1)(ii) of this
section and § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the Natural Resources Article, the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund identified in subsection (d)(2) of this section, and the Rural Legacy
Program identified in subsection (d)(3) of this section and § 5–903(a)(2)(iii) of the Natural
Resources Article by an amount that is proportional to the amount of revenue each program
is estimated to receive for the fiscal year.]
(d) Subject to subsections (d–1) and (e) of this section, for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2002 and for each subsequent fiscal year, the balance of the revenue in the special
fund, not required under subsection (b) of this section and not allocated to the General Fund
under subsection (c)(1) [and (3)] of this section shall be allocated in the State budget as
follows:
(1) (i) 75.15% for the purposes specified in Title 5, Subtitle 9 of the
Natural Resources Article (Program Open Space); and
(ii) an additional 1% for Program Open Space, for land acquisition
purposes as specified in § 5–903(a)(2) of the Natural Resources Article;
(2) 17.05% for the Agricultural Land Preservation Fund established under
§ 2–505 of the Agriculture Article;
(3) 5% for the Rural Legacy Program established under § 5–9A–01 of the
Natural Resources Article; and
(4) 1.8% for the Heritage Conservation Fund established under § 5–1501
of the Natural Resources Article.
(e) The sums allocated in subsection (d) of this section may not revert to the
General Fund of the State.
(h) (1) [Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, if] IF an
appropriation or a transfer from the special fund to the General Fund occurs after the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2018, the Governor shall include in the annual budget bills for each
of the 3 successive fiscal years following the fiscal year in which a transfer is made a
General Fund appropriation to the special fund equal to one–third of the cumulative
amount of the appropriation or transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the
applicable fiscal year.
(2) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) represents reimbursement for the cumulative amount of any
appropriation or transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the applicable fiscal
year;
(ii) is not subject to the provisions of subsections (a), (b), (c), and (f)
of this section;

HOUSE BILL 609
(iii) shall be allocated as provided in subsection (d) of this section and
§ 5–903 of the Natural Resources Article;
(iv) shall be made until the cumulative total appropriated under
paragraph (1) of this subsection is equal to the cumulative amount of any appropriation or
transfer from the special fund to the General Fund for the applicable fiscal year; and
(v) shall be reduced by the amount of any appropriation from the
General Fund to the special fund that:
1. exceeds the required appropriation under this subsection;
and
2. is identified as an appropriation for reimbursement under
this subsection.
[(3) The appropriation required under paragraph (1) of this subsection does
not apply to transfers from the special fund to the General Fund that occur in fiscal years
2026 through 2029.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.